Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.0421

Personal identifiers—Funding.

Each institution of higher education shall use its own existing budgetary funds to develop the system for personal identifiers. No new state funds shall be allocated for this purpose.

[ 2001 c 103 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2001 c 103: See note following RCW 28B.10.042.